Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2912
Association; members; liable only for membership fee and premiums.

No member of the association shall be liable for any amounts because of such membership, other than the membership fee, prescribed in section 44-2911, and premiums.

Laws 1976, LB 809, § 12.